Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-5210
Act, how cited.

Sections
71-5210 to 71-5212 shall be known and
may be cited as the Primary Care Provider Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 69;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 121.